Illinois, session 104th, SB3042.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 15-169.1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-169.1 new)7    Sec. 15-169.1. Homestead exemption for surviving spouse of 8a police officer or firefighter.9    (a) Beginning with taxable year 2026, an annual homestead 10exemption, limited to a reduction of $5,000 from the equalized 11assessed value of the property, is granted for property that 12is used as a qualified residence by the surviving spouse of a 13police officer who is killed in the line of duty on or after 14January 1, 2026 or the surviving spouse of a firefighter who is 15killed in the line of duty on or after January 1, 2026, as long 16as the spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the 17homestead, permanently resides thereon, and does not remarry. 18If the surviving spouse sells the property, an exemption not 19to exceed the amount granted from the most recent ad valorem 20tax roll may be transferred to his or her new residence as long 21as it is used as his or her primary residence and he or she 22does not remarry. 23    (b) If a homestead exemption is granted under this Section   SB3042- 2 -LRB104 19250 HLH 32696 b1and if the qualifying surviving spouse subsequently becomes a 2resident of a facility licensed under the Nursing Home Care 3Act or a facility operated by the United States Department of 4Veterans Affairs, then the exemption shall continue so long as 5the residence remains unoccupied but is still owned by the 6person who qualified for the homestead exemption. 7    (c) Each taxpayer who has been granted an exemption under 8this Section must reapply on an annual basis. Application must 9be made during the application period in effect for the county 10of his or her residence. The assessor or chief county 11assessment officer may determine the eligibility of 12residential property to receive the homestead exemption 13provided by this Section by application, visual inspection, 14questionnaire, or other reasonable methods. The determination 15must be made in accordance with guidelines established by the 16Department. 17    (d) As used in this Section: 18    "Firefighter" means: (i) a person who is a "firefighter" 19or "fireman" as defined in Section 4-106 or 6-106 of the 20Illinois Pension Code; (ii) a paramedic employed by a unit of 21local government; or (iii) an EMT, emergency medical 22technician-intermediate (EMT-I), or advanced emergency medical 23technician (A-EMT) employed by a unit of local government. 24    "Police officer" means: a policeman, as defined in Section 2510-3-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code; a conservation police 26officer; a sheriff or deputy sheriff; or a law enforcement   SB3042- 3 -LRB104 19250 HLH 32696 b1officer employed by the State Police, the Secretary of State, 2or any other State agency, college, or university. 3    "Qualified residence" means real property, but less any 4portion of that property that is used for commercial purposes, 5with an equalized assessed value of less than $250,000 that is 6owned and occupied as the primary residence of the surviving 7spouse of a police officer or firefighter who is killed in the 8line of duty, if that spouse is liable for paying real estate 9taxes on the property and is an owner of record of the property 10or has a legal or equitable interest therein, as evidenced by a 11written instrument. In the case of a leasehold interest in the 12property, the lease must be for a single-family residence. 13Property rented for more than 6 months is presumed to be used 14for commercial purposes.  15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.